North Carolina, session 2025, SB402.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 18C-132 reads as rewritten:
"§ 18C-132. Procedures for drawings and claiming prizes; payment of prizes; protection
of information concerning certain prize winners.
…
(h) The right of any person to a prize shall not be assignable. Payment of any prize may
be paid to a person designated pursuant to a court order. Any prize or portion of a prize remaining
unpaid at the death of a prize winner shall be paid to the estate of the deceased prize winner or
to the trustee of a trust established by the prize winner or as designated in the deceased prize
winner's will, living trust, or other prepared legal instrument if a copy of the trust document or
instrument has been filed with the Director, and no written notice of revocation has been received
by the Director prior to the prize winner's death.
(i) No ticket or share in a lottery game shall be purchased by, and no prize shall be paid
to, a member of the Commission, the Director, or employee of the Commission, or to any spouse,
parent, or child living in the same household as a person disqualified by this subsection.
(j) No prize shall be paid to a person under the age of 18.
(j1) If requested by the prize winner, the identity identifying information of a prize winner
of fifty five million dollars ($50,000,000) ($5,000,000) or more shall be treated as confidential
information under G.S. 132-1.2(8) until 90 days after the winner has claimed the prize.except to
the extent required to do the following:
(1) Notify the North Carolina Department of Revenue to comply with subsection
(l) of this section.
(2) Notify the Internal Revenue Service.
(3) Notify the tax authorities of the state of residence of the prize winner.
(4) Comply with the debt set-off program under G.S. 18C-134 and Chapter 105A
of the General Statutes.
(5) Comply with Article 31 of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes concerning
supplemental proceedings against a judgment debtor.
(6) Comply with a court order.
…."
SECTION 1.5. G.S. 132-1.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 132-1.2. Confidential information.
*S402-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to require or authorize a public agency or its
subdivision to disclose any information that:
…
(8) Reveals the name, address, or other identifying information of any individual
winning more than fifty five million dollars ($50,000,000) ($5,000,000) in a
lottery game who requests to remain anonymous for 90 days, anonymous, as
provided in G.S. 18C-132(j1).
…."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 402-Third Edition